CIK: 313143
Company Name: HAEMONETICS CORP
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2020-05-20
Accession Number: 0000313143-20-000028


ITEM 1 BUSINESS Company Overview Haem1tics is a global healthcare company dedicated to providing a suite of innovative hematology products and solutions to customers to help improve patient care and reduce the cost of healthcare. Our technology addresses important medical markets including blood and plasma comp1nt collection, the surgical suite, and hospital transfusion services. When used in this report, the terms we, us, our and the Company mean Haem1tics. Blood is essential to a modern healthcare system. Blood and its comp1nts (plasma, platelets and red cells) have many vital and frequently life saving clinical applications. Plasma is used for patients with major blood loss and is manufactured into biopharmaceuticals to treat a variety of illnesses, including immune diseases and coagulation disorders. Red cells treat trauma patients or patients undergoing surgery with high blood loss, such as open heart surgery or organ transplant. Platelets have many uses in patient care, including supporting cancer patients undergoing chemotherapy. Haem1tics develops and markets a wide range of devices and solutions to serve our customers. Our Plasma business unit provides plasma collection devices and disposables and plasma donor management software that enable the collection of plasma used by biopharmaceutical companies to make life saving pharmaceuticals. Our Blood Center business unit offers blood collection and processing devices and disposables for red cells, platelets and whole blood as well as related donor management software that make blood donation more efficient and track life giving blood comp1nts. Our Hospital Business unit, which is comprised of Hemostasis Management, Cell Salvage and Transfusion Management products, includes devices and methodologies for measuring the coagulation of blood that enable healthcare providers to better manage their patients bleeding risk, as well as surgical blood salvage systems, specialized blood cell processing systems and disposables and blood transfusion management software that facilitate blood transfusions and cell processing. Market and Products Product Lines We view our operations and manage our business in 3 principal reporting segments Plasma, Blood Center and Hospital. We believe that Plasma and Hospital have growth potential, while Blood Center competes in challenging markets that require us to manage the business differently, including by reducing costs, shrinking the scope of the current product line, and evaluating opportunities to exit unfavorable customer contracts. Financial information concerning these segments is provided in Note 18 to our audited consolidated financial statements contained in Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. The following describes our principal products in each of our segments. Plasma Our Plasma business offers automated plasma collection and donor management software systems that improve the plasma centers yield, efficiency, quality, safety and overall plasma donor experience. We continue to invest in technology that lowers the overall cost to collect plasma while maintaining high standards of quality and safety. Plasma Collection Market for Fractionation Human plasma is collected for 2 purposes. First, it is used for transfusions in patients, such as trauma victims who need to compensate for extreme blood loss, and second, it is processed into pharmaceuticals that aid in the treatment of immune diseases and coagulation disorders. Plasma for transfusion is almost exclusively collected by blood centers as part of their broader mission to supply blood comp1nts. Plasma that is fractionated and manufactured into pharmaceuticals frequently referred to as "source plasma" is mainly collected by vertically integrated biopharmaceutical companies who operate their own collection centers and recruit donors specifically for source plasma donation. The markets for transfusion plasma and source plasma have different participants, product requirements and growth profiles. We serve the market for transfusion plasma through our Blood Center products. 1 of the distinguishing features of the source plasma market is the method of collection. There are 3 primary ways to collect plasma. The first is to collect it from whole blood donations. When whole blood is processed, plasma can be separated at the same time as red cells and platelets and stored for future use. The second is as part of an apheresis procedure that also collects another blood comp1nt. These 2 methods are mainly used by blood centers 1 Table of Contents to collect plasma for transfusions. The third method is a dedicated apheresis procedure that only collects plasma and returns the other blood comp1nts to the donor. This third method is mainly used for source plasma collection. Our Plasma business unit focuses on the collection of source plasma by pharmaceutical manufacturers using apheresis devices that collect plasma and software solutions that support the efficient operation of dedicated source plasma collection centers. Our Blood Center business unit supports the collection of plasma for blood collectors, such as the American Red Cross, using both whole blood and multi comp1nt apheresis collection devices and software solutions that support efficient operation of these types of centers. Over the last 20 years, the collection of source plasma has increasingly been d1 by vertically integrated biopharmaceutical companies such as CSL Behring, Grifols S.A. ("Grifols"), Octapharma AG and Takeda's BioLife business. With their global operations and management expertise, these companies are focused on efficient plasma supply chain management and leveraging information technology to manage operations from the point of plasma donation to fractionation to the production of the final product. Demand for source plasma has continued to grow as an expanding end user market for plasma derived biopharmaceuticals. In particular, therapies that require a significant quantity of plasma to create has fueled an increase in the number of donations and dedicated source plasma collection centers. A significant portion of this growth has occurred in the United States with U.S. produced plasma now meeting an increasing percentage of plasma volume demand worldwide. The U.S. has regulations that are significantly more favorable relative to other markets for plasma collectors. The frequency with which a donor may donate, the volume of plasma that may be donated each time and the ability to remunerate donors are all optimal in the U.S., leading to approximately 80% of worldwide source plasma collections occurring in the U.S. Plasma collectors have long sought changes to plasma collection regulations outside of the U.S. to allow for greater frequency, volume per donation and remuneration but achievements have been limited and no changes are foreseen in the prevalence of U.S. collections. Plasma Products Built around our automated plasma collection devices, related disposables and software, our portfolio of products and services is designed to support multiple facets of plasma collector operations. We have a long standing commitment to understanding our customers' collection and manufacturing processes. As a result, we aim to design equipment that is durable, dependable and easy to use and to provide comprehensive training and support to our plasma collection customers. Today, the vast majority of plasma collections worldwide are performed using automated collection technology at dedicated facilities. We offer multiple products to support these dedicated source plasma operations, including our NexSys PCS and PCS2 plasmapheresis equipment, related disposables and intravenous solutions. We also offer a portfolio of integrated information technology platforms for plasma customers to manage their donors, operations and supply chain. Our software products, including our latest NexLynk DMS donor management system, automate the donor interview and qualification process, streamline the workflow process in the plasma center, provide the controls necessary to evaluate donor suitability, determine the ability to release units collected and manage unit distribution. With our software solutions, plasma collectors can manage processes across the plasma supply chain, ensure quality and compliance business process support, react quickly to business changes and implement opportunities to reduce costs. With our PCS brand, we have provided an automated platform dedicated to the collection of plasma for over 20 years. In fiscal 2018, we received U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA") 510(k) clearance for our next generation device, the NexSys PCS and for the enhancement of our NexSys PCS embedded software that activates YES TM technology, a yield enhancing solution that enables increases in plasma yield per collection by an additional 18 26 mL per donation, on average. We also received CE mark clearance of the NexSys PCS device in the European Union and Australia, subject to additional local requirements, during fiscal 2018. We expect to pursue further regulatory clearances for additional enhancements to the overall product offering. NexSys PCS is designed to enable higher plasma yield collections, improve productivity in our customers centers, enhance the overall donor experience and provide safe and reliable collections that will become life changing medicines for patients. NexSys PCS includes bi directional connectivity to the NexLynk DMS donor management system to improve operational efficiency within plasma centers, through automated programming of donation procedures and automated data capture of procedure data. We have entered into long term commercial contracts and are continuing the rollout and support of NexSys PCS devices and NexLynk DMS donor management software for these Plasma customers. 2 Table of Contents Our Plasma business unit represented 46.4% , 44.1% and 40.2% of our total revenue in fiscal 2020 , 2019 and 2018 , respectively. Blood Center Our Blood Center business offers a range of solutions that improve donor collection centers' ability to acquire blood, filter blood and separate blood comp1nts. We continue to look for solutions to improve donor safety and control costs through the existing product portfolio. Our products and technologies help donor collection centers optimize blood collection capabilities and donor processing management. Blood Center Market There are millions of blood donations throughout the world every year that produce blood products for transfusion to surgical, trauma, or chronically ill patients. Patients typically receive only the blood comp1nts necessary to treat a particular clinical condition. Platelet therapy is frequently used to alleviate the effects of chemotherapy and to help patients with bleeding disorders. Red cells are often transfused to patients to replace blood lost during surgery and transfused to patients with blood disorders, such as sickle cell anemia or aplastic anemia. Plasma, in addition to its role in creating life saving pharmaceuticals, is frequently transfused to replace blood volume in trauma victims and surgical patients. When collecting blood comp1nts there are 2 primary collection methods, manual whole blood donations and automated comp1nt blood collections. While most donations are manual whole blood, the benefit of automated comp1nt blood collections is the ability to collect more than 1 unit of the targeted blood comp1nt. Manual whole blood donations are collected from the donor and then transported to a laboratory where the blood is separated into its comp1nts. Automated comp1nt blood collections separate the blood comp1nt real time while a person is donating blood. In this method, only the specific target blood comp1nt is collected and the remaining comp1nts are returned to the blood donor. While overall we expect total demand for blood to remain stable to slightly declining, demand in individual markets can vary greatly. The development in mature markets of more minimally invasive procedures with lower associated blood loss, as well as hospitals' improved blood management techniques and protocols have more than offset the increasing demand for blood from aging populations. Emerging markets are seeing demand growth with expanded healthcare coverage and greater access to more advanced medical treatments. Blood Center Products We offer automated blood comp1nt and manual whole blood collection systems to blood collection centers to collect blood products efficiently and cost effectively. In addition, we offer software solutions that help blood collection centers with blood drive planning, donor recruitment and retention, blood collection, comp1nt manufacturing and distribution. We market the MCS brand apheresis equipment which is designed to collect specific blood comp1nts from the donor. Utilizing the MCS automated platelet collection protocols, blood centers collect 1 or more therapeutic doses of platelets during a single donation. Our portfolio of disposable whole blood collection and comp1nt storage sets offer flexibility in collecting a unit of whole blood and the subsequent production and storage of blood comp1nts, including options for in line or dockable filters for leukoreduction. Our SafeTrace and El Dorado Donor donation and blood unit management systems span blood center operations and automate and track operations from the recruitment of the blood donor to the disposition of the blood product. Our Hemasphere software solution provides support for more efficient blood drive planning and Donor Doc and e Donor software help to improve donor recruitment and retention. Our Blood Center business unit represented 321% , 34.1% and 37.8% of our total revenue in fiscal 2020 , 2019 and 2018 , respectively. Hospital H ospitals are called upon to provide the highest standard of patient care while at the same time reduce operating costs. Haem1tics' Hospital business has 3 product lines Hemostasis Management, Cell Salvage and Transfusion Management that help decision makers in hospitals optimize blood acquisition, storage and usage in critical settings. 3 Table of Contents Hemostasis Management Hemostasis Management Market Hemostasis refers to a patient's ability to form and maintain blood clots. The clinical management of hemostasis requires that physicians have the most complete information to make decisions on how to best maintain a patient coagulation equilibrium between hemorrhage (bleeding) and thrombosis (clotting). Hemostasis is a critical challenge in various medical procedures, including cardiovascular surgery, organ transplantation, trauma, post partum hemorrhage and percutaneous coronary intervention. By understanding a patient hemostasis status, clinicians can better plan for the patient care pathway. For example, they may decide whether to start or discontinue the use of certain drugs or determine the need for a transfusion and which specific blood comp1nts would be most effective in minimizing blood loss and reducing clotting risk. Such planning supports better care, which can lead to lower hospital costs through a reduction in unnecessary blood product transfusions, reduced adverse transfusion reactions and shorter intensive care unit and hospital stays. Hemostasis Management Products Our portfolio of hemostasis diagnostic systems enables clinicians to assess holistically the coagulation status of a patient at the point of care or laboratory setting. We have 3 device platforms that we market to hospitals and laboratories as an alternative to routine blood tests the TEG 5000 hemostasis analyzer system, the TEG 6s hemostasis analyzer system, and the ClotPro hemostasis analyzer system (acquired in April 2020). Each hemostasis diagnostic system consists of an analyzer that is used with single use reagents and disposables. In addition, TEG Manager software connects multiple TEG 5000 and TEG 6S analyzers throughout the hospital, providing clinicians remote access to both active and historical test results that inform treatment decisions. The TEG 5000 system is approved for a broad set of indications in all of our markets. The TEG 6s system is approved for the same set of indications as the TEG 5000 in Europe, Australia and Japan. We continue to pursue a broader set of indications for TEG 6s in the U.S. During fiscal 2020, we received FDA clearance for the use of TEG 6s in adult trauma settings. This clearance builds on the current indication for the TEG 6s system in cardiovascular surgery and cardiology procedures, making it the first cartridge based system available in the U.S. to evaluate the hemostasis condition in adult trauma patients. The ClotPro system received CE mark clearance in March 2019 and is currently available in select European and Asia Pacific markets. Cell Salvage Cell Salvage Market The Cell Salvage market is mainly comprised of devices designed to transfuse back a patient own blood during or after surgery. Loss of blood is common in many surgical procedures, including open heart, trauma, transplant, vascular and orthopedic procedures, and the need for transfusion of oxygen carrying red cells to make up for lost blood volume is routine. Patients commonly receive donor (or allogeneic) blood which carries various risks for transfusion reactions including chills, fevers or other side effects that can prolong a patient recovery. An alternative to allogeneic blood is surgical cell salvage, also known as autotransfusion, which reduces or eliminates a patient need for blood donated from others and ensures that the patient receives the freshest and safest blood possible his or her own. Surgical cell salvage involves the collection of a patient own blood during or after surgery for reinfusion of red cells to that patient. Blood is sucti1d from the surgical site or collected from a wound or chest drain, processed and washed through a centrifuge based system that yields concentrated red cells available for transfusion back to the patient. This process occurs in a sterile, closed circuit, single use consumable set that is fitted into an electromechanical device. We market our surgical blood salvage products to surgical specialists, primarily cardiovascular, orthopedic and trauma surgeons, and to anesthesiologists and surgical suite service providers. Cell Salvage Products Our Cell Saver Elite + autologous blood recovery system is a surgical blood salvage system targeted to medium to high blood loss procedures, such as cardiovascular, orthopedic, trauma, transplant, vascular, obstetrical and gynecological surgeries. The Cell Saver Elite + is designed to minimize allogeneic blood use and reliably recover and transfuse a patient own high quality blood. 4 Table of Contents Transfusion Management Transfusion Management Market Hospital transfusion services professionals and clinicians are facing cost restraints in addition to the pressure to enhance patient safety, compliance and operational efficiency. Managing the safety and traceability of the blood supply chain and comprehensive management of patients, orders, specimens, blood products, derivatives and accessories across the hospital ne2rk is challenging. In addition, providing clinicians with the vital access to blood when needed most while maintaining traceability is a key priority. Frequently when blood products leave the blood bank, the transfusion management staff loses control and visibility of the blood comp1nts. They often do not know if the blood was handled, stored or transfused properly, which may lead to negative effects on patient safety, product quality, inventory availability and staff efficiency as well as increased waste. Transfusion Management Products Our Transfusion Management solutions are designed to help provide safety, traceability and compliance from the hospital blood bank to the patient bedside and enable consistent care across the hospital ne2rk. Our SafeTrace Tx transfusion management software is considered the system of record for all hospital blood bank and transfusion service information. BloodTrack blood management software is a modular suite of blood management and bedside transfusion solutions that combines software with hardware comp1nts and acts as an extension of the hospital blood bank information system. The software is designed to work with blood storage devices, including the BloodTrack HaemoBank . Our Hospital business unit represented 19.6% , 19.9% and 19.8% of our total revenue in fiscal 2020 , 2019 and 2018 , respectively. Marketing Sales Distribution We market and sell our products to biopharmaceutical companies, blood collection groups and independent blood centers, hospitals and hospital service providers, group purchasing organizations and national health organizations through our own direct sales force (including full time sales representatives and clinical specialists) as well as independent distributors. Sales representatives target the primary decision makers within each of those organizations. Research and Development Our research and development centers in the U.S. ensure that protocol variations are incorporated to closely match local customer requirements. In addition, Haem1tics maintains software development operations in Canada and France. Customer collaborations are also an important part of our technical strength and competitive advantage. These collaborations with customers and transfusion experts provide us with ideas for new products and applications, enhanced protocols and potential test sites as well as objective evaluations and expert opinions regarding technical and performance issues. The development of blood comp1nt separation products, hemostasis analyzers and software has required us to maintain technical expertise in various engineering disciplines, including mechanical, electrical, software, biomedical engineering and chemistry. Innovations resulting from these various engineering efforts enable us to develop systems that are faster, smaller and more user friendly, or that incorporate additional features important to our customer base. In fiscal 2020 , research and development resources were allocated to support innovation across our portfolio, including investments in clinical programs for our Hemostasis Management product line. A key element of our strategy in the U.S. for our Hemostasis Management product line has been to invest in clinical trials to support expanded FDA labeling including a trauma indication for our TEG 6s. In May 2019, we received FDA clearance for the use of TEG 6s in adult trauma settings. This clearance builds on the current indication for the TEG 6s system in cardiovascular surgery and cardiology procedures, making it the first cartridge based system available in the U.S. to evaluate the hemostasis condition in adult trauma patients. In November 2019, we announced global commercial availability for the four channel TEG 6s PlateletMapping ADP & AA assay cartridge, which is used by clinicians to assess a patient bleeding and thrombotic risk due to inhibition of platelet function caused by anticoagulants such as aspirin. In December 2019, we also announced the North America commercial availability for the next generation of SafeTrace Tx Transfusion Management Software. This software version features significant improvements to the user experience and workflow efficiency. Additionally, we continue to invest resources in next generation plasma collection and software systems. Manufacturing We endeavor to supply products that are both high quality and cost competitive for our customers by leveraging continuous improvement methodologies, focusing on our core competencies and partnering with strategic suppliers that complement our 5 Table of Contents capabilities. In general, we design our equipment and consumables and use contract manufacturers to build the devices, while the majority of consumables are manufactured by us. Our production activities occur in controlled settings or clean room environments and have built in quality checks throughout the manufacturing processes. Our manufacturing teams are focused on continuously improving our productivity, product cost and product quality through change control procedures, validations and strong supplier management programs. We regularly review our logistics capabilities, inventory and safety stock levels and maintain business continuity plans to address supply disruptions that may occur. Our primary consumable manufacturing operations are located in North America and Malaysia. Contract manufacturers also supply comp1nt sets and liquid solutions according to our specifications and manufacture in Mexico, Japan, Singapore, Thailand and the Philippines. Our devices are principally manufactured in Malaysia, Australia and the U.S. Plastics and other petroleum based products are the principal comp1nt of our disposable products and can be affected by oil and gas prices. Contracts with our suppliers help to mitigate some of the short term effects of price volatility in this market. However, increases in the price of petroleum derivatives could result in corresponding increases in our costs to procure plastic raw materials. Intellectual Property We consider our intellectual property rights to be important to our business. We rely on a combination of patent, trademark, copyright and trade secret laws, as well as provisions in our agreements with third parties, to protect our intellectual property rights. We hold numerous patents in the United States and have applied for numerous additional U.S. patents relating to our products and related technologies. We also own or have applied for corresponding patents in selected foreign countries. These patents cover certain elements of our products and processes, including protocols employed in our equipment and aspects of certain of our disposables. Our patents may cover current products, products in markets we plan to enter, or products in markets we plan to license to others. Certain patents may also be defensive in that they are directed to technologies not currently embodied in our current products. We also license patent rights from third parties that cover technologies that we use or plan to use in our business. We own various trademarks that have been registered in the United States and certain other countries. Our policy is to obtain patent and trademark rights in the U.S. and foreign countries where such rights are available and we believe it is commercially advantageous to do so. However, the standards for international protection of intellectual property vary widely. We cannot assure that pending patent and trademark applications will result in issued patents and registered trademarks, that patents issued to or licensed by us will not be challenged or circumvented by competitors, or that our patents will not be determined invalid. To maintain our competitive position, we also rely on the technical expertise and know how of our personnel. We believe that unpatented know how and trade secrets relied upon in connection with our business and products are generally as important as patent protection in establishing and maintaining a competitive advantage. Competition To remain competitive, we must continue to develop and acquire new cost effective products, information technology platforms and business services. We believe that our ability to maintain a competitive advantage will continue to depend on a combination of factors. Some factors are largely within our control such as (i) maintenance of a positive reputation among our customers, (ii) development of new products that meet our customer's needs, (iii) obtaining regulatory approvals for our products in key markets, (iv) obtaining patents that protect our innovations, (v) development and protection of proprietary know how in important technological areas, (vi) product quality, safety and cost effectiveness and (vii) continual and rigorous documentation of clinical performance. Other factors are outside of our control. We could see changes in regulatory standards or clinical practice that favor a competitor's technology or reduce revenues in key areas of our business. Our technical staff is highly skilled, but certain competitors have substantially greater financial resources and larger technical staff at their disposal. There can be no assurance that competitors will not direct substantial efforts and resources toward the development and marketing of products competitive with those of Haem1tics. In addition, we face competition from several large, global companies with product offerings similar to ours. Terumo BCT and Fresenius SE & Co. KGaA, in particular, have significantly greater financial and other resources than we do and are strong competitors in a number of our businesses. The following provides an overview of the key competitors in each of our 3 global product enterprises. 6 Table of Contents Plasma In the automated plasma collection market, we principally compete with Fresenius' Fenwal Aurora and Aurora Xi product lines on the basis of speed, plasma yield per donation, quality, reliability, ease of use, services and technical features of the collection systems and on the long term cost effectiveness of equipment and disposables. In China, the market is populated by local producers of a product that is intended to be similar to ours. Recently, those competitors have expanded to markets beyond China, including European and South American countries. In the field of plasma related software, MAK Systems is the primary competitor along with applications developed internally by our customers. Blood Center Most donations worldwide are traditional manual whole blood collections and approximately 30% of the Blood Center portfolio competes in this space. We face intense competition in our whole blood business on the basis of quality and price. Our main competitors are Fresenius, MacoPharma and Terumo. Our MCS automated comp1nt blood collections, which represents approximately 65% of the Blood Center portfolio, not only compete against the traditional manual whole blood collection market (particularly in red cells) but also compete with products from Terumo and Fresenius. Technology is the key differentiator in automated comp1nt blood collections, as measured by the time to collect more than 1 unit of a specific targeted blood comp1nt. While not all donors are eligible to donate more than 1 unit, it continues to become more prevalent in markets with a significant number of eligible donors. Therefore, both Haem1tics and our competitors continue to experience downward pressure on collection through single platelet collection procedures. In Blood Center software, MAK Technologies is a competitor along with systems developed internally by our customers. Our software portfolio is predominately a U.S. based business. Hospital Hemostasis Management Our hemostasis analyzer systems are used primarily in surgical applications. Competition includes routine coagulation tests, such as prothrombin time, partial thromboplastin time and platelet count marketed by various manufacturers, such as Instrumentation Laboratory, Diagnostica Stago SAS and Sysmex. The TEG analyzer competes with these routine laboratory tests based on its ability to provide a more complete picture of a patient's hemostasis at a single point in time and to measure the clinically relevant platelet function for an individual patient. In addition, TEG and ClotPro systems compete more directly with other advanced blood test systems, including ROTEM analyzers, the VerifyNow System and HemoSonics Quantra . ROTEM and VerifyNow instruments are marketed by Instrumentation Laboratory, a subsidiary of Werfen. HemoSonics is owned and offered by Diagnostica Stago. There are also additional technologies being explored to assess viscoelasticity and other characteristics that can provide insights into the coagulation status of a patient. Cell Salvage In the intraoperative autotransfusion market, competition is based on reliability, ease of use, service, support and price. For high volume platforms, each manufacturer's technology is similar and our Cell Saver technology competes principally with products offered by LivaNova PLC, Medtronic and Fresenius. Transfusion Management SafeTrace Tx and BloodTrack compete in the transfusion management software market within the broader category of hospital information systems. SafeTrace Tx is an FDA regulated blood bank information system ("BBIS") that integrates and communicates with other healthcare information systems such as the electronic health record and laboratory information system within the hospital. The BloodTrack software, also FDA regulated, is an extension of the BBIS and provides secure, traceable blood units at the point of care, including trauma, surgery, outpatient and critical care settings. Growth drivers for these markets include patient safety, operational efficiencies and compliance. SafeTrace Tx competition primarily consists of stand al1 BBIS including WellSky and some Electronic Health Record software that includes a built in transfusion management solution including Cerner. Global competition for BloodTrack varies by country including MSoft in Europe and established blood practices in the U.S. such as using standard refrigerators and manual movement of blood products. BloodTrack integrates with the hospital existing lab or blood bank system allowing for greater market acceptance. 7 Table of Contents Significant Customers In fiscal 2020 , 2019 and 2018 , our ten largest customers accounted for approximately 54% , 52% and 45% of our net revenues, respectively. In fiscal 2020 , 2019 and 2018 , 2 of our Plasma customers, CSL Plasma Inc. ("CSL") and Grifols, each were greater than 10% of total net revenues and in total accounted for approximately 27% , 27% and 26% of our net revenues, respectively. Additionally, 1 of our customers accounted for greater than 10% of our Blood Center segment net revenues in fiscal 2020 , 2019 and 2018 . Government Regulation Due to the variety of products that we manufacture, we and our products are subject to a wide variety of regulations by numerous government agencies, including the FDA, and similar agencies outside the U.S. To varying degrees, each of these agencies requires us to comply with laws and regulations governing the development, testing, manufacturing, labeling, marketing and distribution of our products. Medical Device Regulation Premarket Requirements U.S. Unless an exemption applies, all medical devices introduced to the U.S. market are required by the FDA, as a condition of marketing, to secure either clearance of a 510(k) pre market notification, de novo authorization, or approval of premarket approval application, or PMA. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes. Devices deemed to pose a low or moderate risk are placed in class I or II, which requires the manufacturer to submit to the FDA a 510(k) premarket notification requesting clearance for commercial distribution, unless the device type is exempt from this requirement. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk or devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device are placed in class III, requiring submission and approval of a PMA or risk based classification through the de novo process. The 510(k) clearance, de novo authorization, and PMA processes can be resource intensive, expensive, lengthy and require payment of significant user fees. To obtain 510(k) clearance, we must submit a premarket notification demonstrating that the proposed device is substantially equivalent to a previously 510(k) cleared device or a device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which the FDA has not yet called for the submission of PMAs, or a device that has been the subject of a de novo authorization. The FDA 510(k) clearance pathway usually takes from 3 to 12 months from the date the notification is submitted, but it can take longer, depending on the extent of the FDA's requests for additional information and the amount of time a sponsor takes to fulfill them. After a device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, will require a new 510(k) clearance or could require premarket approval. Another procedure for obtaining marketing authorization for a medical device is the de novo authorization process. The de novo process is a route to market for novel medical devices that are low to moderate risk and are not substantially equivalent to a predicate device. Once a de novo application is reviewed and authorized by the FDA, it results in the device having a Class I or II status and future devices from the company or a competitor may use the device as a 510(k) predicate. A PMA must be submitted if a device cannot be cleared through the 510(k) clearance process or authorized as a class II device through the de novo process. The PMA process is generally more detailed, lengthier and more expensive than the 510(k) and de novo processes. To date, we have no PMA approved products and do not have any class III products on our product pipeline. Postmarket Requirements U.S. After the FDA permits a device to enter commercial distribution, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include, among others The FDA's Quality System Regulation, or QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party device manufacturers, to follow quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the manufacturing process; Labeling regulations including unique device identification; Clearance of a 510(k) for certain product modifications; Medical device reporting, or MDR, regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur; and Medical device correction and removal (recall) reporting regulations 8 Table of Contents Additionally, we and the manufacturing facilities of our suppliers are subject to unannounced inspections by the FDA to determine our compliance with the QSR and other applicable regulations described above. The FDA can issue warning letters or untitled letters, seek a court order detaining or seizing certain devices, seek an injunctions, suspend regulatory clearance or approvals, ban certain medical devices, order repair, replacement or refund of those devices and require notification of health professionals and others with regard to medical devices that present risks of substantial harm to the public health. The FDA may also initiate action for criminal prosecution of such violations. Requirements Outside the U.S. The regulatory review process varies from country to country and may in some cases require the submission of clinical data. Our international sales are subject to regulatory requirements in the countries in which our products are sold. These regulations will be significantly modified in the next couple of years. For example, in May 2017, the EU Medical Devices Regulation (Regulation 2017 745) was adopted. The EU Medical Devices Regulation, or EU MDR, repeals and replaces the EU Medical Devices Directive. The EU MDR, among other things, is intended to establish a uniform, transparent, predictable and sustainable regulatory framework across the European Economic Area for medical devices and ensure a high level of safety and health while supporting innovation. Manufacturers of currently approved medical devices will have until May 2021 to meet the requirements of the EU MDR, which reflects the EU decision in April 2020 to postp1 the implementation date 1 year due to the impact of COVID 19 . Once applicable, the new regulations will among other things strengthen the rules on placing devices on the market and reinforce surveillance once they are available; establish explicit provisions on manufacturers responsibilities; improve the traceability of medical devices; set up a central database to provide comprehensive information on products available in the EU; and strengthen rules for the assessment of certain high risk devices before they are placed on the market. In the meantime, the current EU Medical Devices Directive continues to apply. The corresponding regulation for in vitro diagnostics, the EU In Vitro Diagnostic Devices Regulation (Regulation 2017 746), or EU IVDR, becomes applicable in May 2022 In the meantime, the current EU In Vitro Diagnostic Directive continues to apply. Drug Regulation Development and Approval Under the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, FDA approval of a new drug application, or NDA, is generally required before any new drug can be marketed in the U.S. Under the Public Health Service Act, or PHSA, FDA licensure of a biologics license application, or BLA, is required before a biologic can be marketed in the U.S. NDAs and BLAs require extensive studies and submission of a large amount of data by the applicant. A generic version of an approved drug is approved by means of an abbreviated new drug application, or ANDA, by which the sponsor demonstrates that the proposed product is the same as the approved, brand name drug, which is referred to as the reference listed drug, or RLD. Generally, an ANDA must contain data and information showing that the proposed generic product and RLD have the same active ingredient, in the same strength and dosage form, to be delivered via the same route of administration, are intended for the same uses and are bioequivalent. This more limited data set is in lieu of independently demonstrating the proposed product safety and effectiveness, which are inferred from the fact that the product is the same as the RLD, which the FDA previously found to be safe and effective. We currently hold NDAs and ANDAs for liquid solutions (including anticoagulants, intravenous saline and a red blood cell storage solution), which we sell with our blood comp1nt and whole blood collection systems. Post Approval Regulation After the FDA permits a drug to enter commercial distribution, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include the FDA's current Good Manufacturing Practices, which include a series of requirements relating to organization and training of personnel, buildings and facilities, equipment, control of comp1nts and drug product containers and closures, production and process controls, quality control and quality assurance, packaging and labeling controls, holding and distribution, and laboratory controls and records and reports. The FDA has also established labeling regulations, advertising and 9 Table of Contents promotion requirements and restrictions; regulations regarding conducting recalls of product and requirements relating to the reporting of adverse events. Failure to comply with applicable FDA requirements and restrictions in this area may subject a company to adverse publicity, such as warning letters, and enforcement action by the FDA, the Department of Justice, or the Office of the Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services, as well as state authorities. This could subject a company to a range of penalties that could have a significant commercial impact, including civil and criminal fines and agreements that materially restrict the manner in which a company promotes or distributes drug or biological products. Requirements Outside the U.S. We must obtain the requisite marketing authorizations from regulatory authorities in foreign countries prior to marketing of a product in those countries. The requirements and process governing product licensing vary from country to country. If we fail to comply with applicable foreign regulatory requirements, we may be subject to, among other things, warning letters or untitled letters, injunctions, civil, administrative, or criminal penalties, m1tary fines or imprisonment, suspension or withdrawal of regulatory approvals, suspension of ongoing clinical studies, refusal to approve pending applications or supplements to applications filed by us, suspension or the imposition of restrictions on operations, product recalls, the refusal to permit the import or export of our products or the seizure or detention of products. Conflict Minerals The Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act imposes disclosure requirements regarding the use of "Conflict Minerals" mined from the Democratic Republic of Congo and adjoining countries in products, whether or not these products are manufactured by third parties. The conflict minerals include tin, tantalum, tungsten and gold and their derivatives. These requirements could affect the pricing, sourcing and availability of minerals used in the manufacture of our products. There may be material additional costs associated with complying with the disclosure requirements, such as costs related to determining the source of any conflict minerals used in our products. Our supply chain is complex and we may be unable to verify the origins for all metals used in our products as well as costs of possible changes to products processes, or sources of supply as a consequence of such verification activities. Fraud and Abuse Laws We are subject to fraud and abuse and other healthcare laws and regulations that constrain the business or financial arrangements and relationships through which we market, sell and distribute our products. In addition, we are subject to transparency laws and patient privacy regulation by U.S. federal and state governments and by governments in foreign jurisdictions in which we conduct our business. We have described below some of the key federal, state and foreign healthcare laws and regulations that apply to our business. The federal healthcare program Anti Kickback Statute prohibits, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting or receiving remuneration, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to induce or in return for purchasing, leasing, ordering or arranging for or recommending the purchase, lease or order of any healthcare item or service reimbursable, in whole or in part, under Medicare, Medicaid or other federally financed healthcare programs. This statute has been interpreted to apply to arrangements between manufacturers of federally reimbursed products on 1 hand and prescribers, purchasers and others in a position to recommend, refer, or order federally reimbursed products on the other. Although there are a number of statutory exemptions and regulatory safe harbors protecting certain common activities from prosecution, the exemptions and safe harbors are drawn narrowly and practices that involve remuneration to those who prescribe, purchase, or recommend medical devices or pharmaceutical and biological products, including certain discounts, or engaging consultants as speakers or consultants, may be subject to scrutiny if they do not fit squarely within the exemption or safe harbor. Our practices may not in all cases meet all of the criteria for safe harbor protection from anti kickback liability. Moreover, there are no safe harbors for many common practices, such as educational and research grants. Liability may be established without a person or entity having actual knowledge of the federal Anti Kickback Statute or specific intent to violate it. In addition, the government may assert that a claim including Item or services resulting from a violation of the federal Anti Kickback Statute constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of the civil False Claims Act. The federal civil False Claims Act prohibits, among other things, any person from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, a false, fraudulent or materially incomplete claim for payment of government funds, or knowingly making, using, or causing to be made or used, a false record or statement material to an obligation to pay m1y to the government or knowingly concealing or knowingly and improperly avoiding, decreasing, or concealing an obligation to pay m1y to the federal government. In recent years, companies in the healthcare industry have faced enforcement actions under the federal False Claims Act for, among other things, allegedly providing free product to customers with the expectation that the customers would bill federal programs for the product or causing false claims to be submitted because of the company marketing the 10 Table of Contents product for unapproved and thus non reimbursable, uses. False Claims Act liability is potentially significant in the healthcare industry because the statute provides for treble damages and mandatory penalties of tens of thousands of dollars per false claim or statement. Healthcare companies also are subject to other federal false claims laws, including, among others, federal criminal healthcare fraud and false statement statutes that extend to non government health benefit programs. The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, or HIPAA, as amended by the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act, or HITECH, among other things, imposes criminal and civil liability for knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private third party payors and knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. In addition, the Physician Payment Sunshine Act, implemented as the Open Payments program, requires manufacturers of certain products reimbursed by Medicare, Medicaid, or the Children Health Insurance Program to track and report to the federal government payments and transfers of value that they make to physicians and teaching hospitals and ownership interests held by physicians and their family and provides for public disclosures of these data. Many states have adopted analogous laws and regulations, including state anti kickback and false claims laws, which may apply to Item or services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs or, in several states, regardless of the payor. Several states have enacted legislation requiring pharmaceutical and medical device companies to, among other things, establish marketing compliance programs; file periodic reports with the state, including reports on gifts and payments to individual health care providers; make periodic public disclosures on sales, marketing, pricing, clinical trials and other activities; and or register their sales representatives. Some states prohibit specified sales and marketing practices, including the provision of gifts, meals, or other Item to certain health care providers and or offering co pay support to patients for certain prescription drugs. Other countries, including a number of EU Member States, have laws of similar application. Environmental Matters Failure to comply with international, federal and local environmental protection laws or regulations could have an adverse impact on our business or could require material capital expenditures. We continue to monitor changes in U.S. and international environmental regulations that may present a significant risk to the business, including laws or regulations relating to the manufacture or sale of products using plastics. Employees As of March 28, 2020 , we employed the full time equivalent of 3,004 persons. Availability of Reports and Other Information All of our corporate governance materials, including the Principles of Corporate Governance, Code of Conduct and the charters of the Audit, Compensation, Governance and Compliance and Technology Committees are published on the Investor Relations section of our website at www.haem1tics.com . On this web site the public can also access, free of charge, our annual, quarterly and current reports and other documents filed or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission, or SEC, as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. The SEC maintains an internet site ( http www.sec.gov ) that contains reports, proxy and information statements and other information regarding issuers that file documents electronically. Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward Looking Information Certain statements that we make from time to time, including statements contained in this Annual Report on Form 10 K and incorporated by reference into this report, constitute forward looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933 and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Forward looking statements do not relate strictly to historical or current facts and reflect management assumptions, views, plans, objectives and projections about the future. Forward looking statements may be identified by the use of words such as may, will, should, could, would, expects, plans, anticipates, believes, estimates, projects, predicts, potential and other words of similar meaning in conjunction with, among other things discussions of future operations; expected operating results and financial performance; impacts of the COVID 19 pandemic; the Company strategy for growth; product development, commercialization and anticipated performance and benefits; regulatory approvals; impact of planned acquisitions or dispositions; market position and expenditures. 11 Table of Contents Because forward looking statements are based on current beliefs, expectations and assumptions regarding future events, they are subject to uncertainties, risks and changes that are difficult to predict and many of which are outside of the Company's control. Investors should realize that if underlying assumptions prove inaccurate, or known or unknown risks or uncertainties materialize, the Company actual results and financial condition could vary materially from expectations and projections expressed or implied in its forward looking statements. Investors are therefore cauti1d not to rely on these forward looking statements. The following are some important factors that could cause our actual results to differ from our expectations in any forward looking statements. For further discussion of these and other factors, see Item 1A. Risk Factors in this report. The effect of the ongoing COVID 19 pandemic, or outbreaks of communicable diseases, on our business, financial conditions and results of operations, which may be heightened if the pandemic and various government responses to it continue for an extended period of time; Failure to achieve our long term strategic and financial improvement goals; Demand for and market acceptance risks for new and existing products, including material reductions in purchasing from or loss of a significant customer; Product quality or safety concerns, leading to product recalls, withdrawals, regulatory action by the FDA (or similar non U.S. regulatory agencies), reputational damage, declining sales or litigation; Security breaches of our information technology systems or our products, which could impair our ability to conduct business or compromise sensitive information of the Company or its customers, suppliers and other business partners, or of customers' patients; Pricing pressures resulting from trends toward health care cost containment, including the continued consolidation among health care providers and other market participants; The continuity, availability and pricing of plastic and other raw materials, finished goods and comp1nts used in the manufacturing of our products (including those purchased from sole source suppliers) and the related continuity of our manufacturing and distribution; Our ability to develop new products or enhancements on commercially acceptable terms or at all; Our ability to obtain the anticipated benefits of restructuring programs that we have or may undertake, including the Operational Excellence Program; The potential that the expected strategic benefits and opportunities from any planned or completed acquisition or divestiture by the Company may not be realized or may take longer to realize than expected; The impact of enhanced requirements to obtain regulatory approval in the U.S. and around the world, including the EU MDR and the associated timing and cost of product approval, and Our ability to comply with established and developing U.S. and foreign legal and regulatory requirements, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, or FCPA, and similar laws in other jurisdictions, as well as U.S. and foreign export and import restrictions and tariffs; Our ability to execute and realize anticipated benefits from our investments in emerging economies; Our ability to retain and attract key personnel; Costs and risks associated with product liability and other litigation claims; Our ability to meet our existing debt obligations and raise additional capital when desire on terms reasonably acceptable to us; The potential effect of foreign currency fluctuations and interest rate fluctuations on our net sales, expenses, and resulting margins; 12 Table of Contents The impact of changes in U.S. and international tax laws; Market conditions impacting our stock price and or share repurchase program, and the possibility that our share repurchase program may be delayed, suspended or discontinued; and Our ability to protect intellectual property and the outcome of patent litigation. Investors should understand that it is not possible to predict or identify all such factors and should not consider the risks described above and in Item 1A. Risk Factors to be a complete statement of all potential risks and uncertainties. The Company does not undertake to publicly update any forward looking statement that may be made from time to time, whether as a result of new information or future events or developments. 13 Table of Contents ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS In addition to the other information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10 K and the exhibits hereto, the following risk factors should be considered carefully in evaluating our business. Our business, financial condition, cash flows or results of operations could be materially adversely affected by any of these risks. This section contains forward looking statements. Please refer to the cautionary statements made under the heading "Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward Looking Information" at the end of Item 1 of this Annual Report on Form 10 K for more information on the qualifications and limitations on forward looking statements. The ongoing COVID 19 pandemic, or outbreaks of communicable diseases, could have a material adverse impact on our business, financial condition, cash flows and results of operations, which may be heightened if the pandemic and various government responses to it continue for an extended period of time. The COVID 19 outbreak has significantly impacted economic activity and markets around the world. If the pandemic continues and conditions worsen, we could suffer a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, cash flows and results of operations in numerous ways, including, but not limited to, those outlined below Product Demand. As a result of COVID 19, we have experienced in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2020, and expect to experience more significantly in fiscal 2021, decreased demand for our products and increased volatility in demand for our products. For example, lower collection volumes at source plasma collection centers due to COVID 19 factors, including stay at home and other government orders designed to slow the spread of COVID 19, donor safety concerns, and reduced donor collection capacity due to shutdowns and social distancing requirements, have adversely affected and likely will continue to adversely affect demand for our Plasma disposable products. Additionally, reductions in elective surgeries and trauma cases, restrictions on vendor access at customer sites and the reallocation of hospital resources to address critical intensive care needs during the COVID 19 pandemic have adversely affected and will likely continue to adversely affect demand for our Hospital products, particularly our Cell Saver and TEG devices. We also have experienced, and may continue to experience, in certain markets rapid and unpredictable changes in demand for some of our Blood Center disposable products as blood collectors seek to replenish their blood product inventories and safety stocks. Such changes could impact our ability to meet demand on a timely basis or could result in potential reductions in demand in future periods if the supply of blood held by our customers significantly exceeds the demand for blood from hospitals due to declines of elective surgeries and trauma cases. Finally, we may experience delays in our clinical trials as a result of COVID 19 that may result in delays for new or expanded authorizations for our products, which could adversely affect our development and commercialization plans for our products. Manufacturing, Supply Chain and Distribution System Disruption. COVID 19 and its associated economic disruptions could have an adverse impact on our manufacturing capacity, supply chains and distribution systems, including as a result of impacts associated with preventive and precautionary measures that we, other businesses and governments are taking and financial difficulties experienced by our third party manufacturers and suppliers . Although we have not experienced significant manufacturing or supply chain difficulties to date as a result of COVID 19, we may in the future. A reduction or interruption in any of our manufacturing processes could have a material adverse effect on our business. Potential Liquidity and Credit Impacts. While we have significant sources of cash and liquidity and access to committed credit lines, we may be adversely impacted by delays in payments of outstanding receivables if our customers experience financial difficulties or are unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations, which may adversely impact their ability to pay for our products on a timely basis, if at all, which in turn would adversely affect our financial condition. Moreover, conditions in the financial and credit markets could increase the cost of and our accessibility to capital. If we need to access capital, there can be no assurance that financing may be available on attractive terms, if at all. These and other impacts of COVID 19 may also have the effect of heightening many of the other risks described in the Risk Factors section of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. We believe the magnitude of the adverse impact of these factors on our business, financial condition, cash flows and results of operations will be primarily driven by the severity and duration of the COVID 19 pandemic; the timing, scope and effectiveness of governmental responses to the COVID 19 pandemic and associated economic disruptions; general confidence about personal health and safety; and the COVID 19 pandemic impact on U.S. and international healthcare systems, the U.S. economy and the worldwide economy. 14 Table of Contents If our business strategy does not yield the expected results or we fail to implement the necessary changes to our operations, we could see material adverse effects on our business, financial condition or results of operations. We view our operations and manage our business in 3 principal reporting segments Plasma, Blood Center and Hospital. We believe that Plasma and Hospital have growth potential, while Blood Center competes in challenging markets that require us to manage the business differently, including reducing costs, shrinking the scope of the current product line and evaluating opportunities to exit unfavorable customer contracts. If we have not correctly identified the product categories with greatest growth potential, we will not allocate our resources appropriately which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Further, if we are unable to reduce costs and complexity in our Blood Center business unit, we will obtain lower than expected cash flows to fund our future growth and capital needs. This could have a material adverse effect on our liquidity and results of operations. Material reductions in purchasing from or loss of a significant customer could adversely affect our business. In fiscal 2020 , our 2 largest Plasma customers each accounted for more than 10% of our net revenues and our ten largest customers accounted for approximately 54% of our net revenues. If any of our largest customers materially reduce their purchases from us or terminate their relationship with us for any reason, including material decreases in demand for plasma or development of alternative processes, we could experience an adverse effect on our results of operations or financial condition. 3 of our largest Plasma customers have contracts that are subject to renewal before the end of fiscal 2022 In the event that we do not extend our current contracts or enter into new contracts with these customers on acceptable terms, our revenues and operating income could be negatively impacted in a manner that could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations or financial condition. Defects or quality issues associated with our products could adversely affect the results of operations. Quality is extremely important to us and our customers due to the serious and costly consequences of product failure. Manufacturing or design defects, comp1nt failures, unapproved or improper use of our products, or inadequate disclosure of risks or other information relating to the use of our products can lead to injury or other serious adverse events. These events could lead to recalls or safety alerts relating to our products (either voluntary or as required by the FDA or similar governmental authorities in other countries), and could result, in certain cases, in the removal of a product from the market. A recall could result in significant costs and lost sales and customers, enforcement actions and or investigations by state and federal governments or other enforcement bodies, as well as negative publicity and damage to our reputation that could reduce future demand for our products. Personal injuries relating to the use of our products can also result in significant product liability claims being brought against us. In some circumstances, such adverse events could also cause delays in regulatory approval of new products or the imposition of post market approval requirements. If we are unable to successfully convert customers to our NexSys platform, meet customer placement demands or negotiate competitive pricing, we may not realize the intended benefits of our investment. We have focused heavily on the development and commercialization of our NexSys platform, comprised of both the NexSys PCS plasmapheresis system and NexLynk DMS software. Since the commercial launch of our NexSys platform in fiscal 2019, we have entered into long term customer contracts providing for conversion to NexSys. However, if additional customers do not adopt NexSys or they do and we are unable to procure sufficient NexySys PCS devices from our contract manufacturers to meet demand or receive a price that provides an inadequate return on our investment, or if such customer adoption does not occur within the expected timeframe, we may not realize the full intended benefits of our investment. 15 Table of Contents We are increasingly dependent on information technology systems and subject to privacy and security laws and a cyber attack or other breach of these systems could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. We increasingly rely on information technology systems, including cloud based computing, to process, transmit and store electronic information for our day to day operations and for our customers, including sensitive personal information and proprietary or confidential information. Additionally, certain of our products collect data regarding patients and donors and connect to our systems for maintenance and other purposes or are actively managed by Haem1tics on behalf of specific customers. Similar to other large multi national companies, the size and complexity of our information technology systems makes them vulnerable to a cyber attack, malicious intrusion, breakdown, destruction, loss of data privacy, or other significant disruption. We also outsource certain elements of our information technology systems to third parties that, as a result of this outsourcing, could have access to certain confidential information and whose systems may also be vulnerable to these types of attacks or disruptions. Security threats, including cyber and other attacks are becoming increasingly sophisticated, frequent, and adaptive and, like other large multi national companies, we have experienced cyber incidents in the past and may experience them in the future. Accordingly, our information systems require an ongoing commitment of significant resources to maintain, protect and enhance existing systems and develop new systems to keep pace with continuing changes in information processing technology, evolving systems and regulatory standards, the increasing need to protect patient and customer information and changing customer patterns. Although prior cyber incidents have not had a material effect on our business and we have invested and continue to invest in the protection of personal information and proprietary or confidential information, there can be no assurance that our efforts will prevent cyber attacks, intrusions, breakdowns or other incidents or ensure compliance with all applicable securities and privacy laws, regulations, standard standards. In addition, third parties may attempt to hack into our products to obtain data relating to patients with our products or our proprietary information. Any failure by us or third parties we work with to maintain or protect our respective information technology systems and data integrity, including from cyber attacks, intrusions or other breaches, could result in the unauthorized access to patient data and personally identifiable information, theft of intellectual property or other misappropriation of assets, or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. Any of these events, in turn, may cause us to lose existing customers, have difficulty preventing, detecting and controlling fraud, have disputes with customers, physicians and other healthcare professionals, be subject to legal claims and liability, have regulatory sanctions or penalties imposed, have increases in operating expenses, incur expenses or lose revenues as a result of a data privacy breach or theft of intellectual property, or suffer other adverse consequences, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Additionally, the legal and regulatory environment surrounding information security and privacy is increasingly demanding, with the imposition of new and changing requirements across businesses. We are required to comply with increasingly complex and changing legal and regulatory requirements that govern the collection, use, storage, security, transfer, disclosure and other processing of personal data in the United States and in other countries, including, but not limited to, HIPAA, HITECH, the California Consumer Privacy Act, or CCPA, and the European Union General Data Protection Regulation, or GDPR. The GDPR imposes stringent European Union data protection requirements and provides for significant penalties for noncompliance. HIPAA also imposes stringent data privacy and security requirements and the regulatory authority has imposed significant fines and penalties on organizations found to be out of compliance. CCPA provides consumers with a private right of action against companies who have a security breach due to lack of appropriate security measures. We or our third party providers and business partners may also be subjected to audits or investigations by 1 or more domestic or foreign government agencies relating to compliance with information security and privacy laws and regulations, and noncompliance with the laws and regulations could results in material fines or litigation. We outsource certain aspects of our business to a single third party vendor that subjects us to risks, including disruptions in business and increased costs. Currently, we rely on a single vendor to support several of our business processes, including customer service and support and elements of enterprise technology, procurement, accounting and human resources. We make diligent efforts to ensure that the provider of these outsourced services is observing proper internal control practices. However, there are no guarantees that failures will not occur. Accordingly, we are subject to the risks associated with the vendor ability to successfully provide the necessary services to meet our needs. If our vendor is unable to adequately protect our data or information is lost, if our ability to deliver our services is interrupted (including as a result of significant outbreaks of disease, including the ongoing COVID 19 pandemic, natural disasters, strikes, terrorism attacks or other adverse events in the countries in which the vendor operates), if our vendor's fees are higher than expected, or if our vendor makes mistakes in the execution of operations support, then our business and operating results may be negatively affected. 16 Table of Contents A significant portion of our revenue derives from the sale of blood collection supplies. Declines in the number of blood collection procedures have adversely impacted our business and future declines may have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. The demand for whole blood disposable products in the U.S. continued to decrease in fiscal 2020 due to sustained declines in transfusion rates caused by hospitals' improved blood management techniques and protocols. In response to this trend, U.S. blood center collection groups prefer single source vendors for their whole blood collection products and are primarily focused on obtaining the lowest average selling prices. We expect to see continued declines in transfusion rates and the market to remain price focused and highly competitive for the foreseeable future. Continued declines in this market could have a material adverse effect on our liquidity and results of operations. Consolidation of healthcare providers and blood collectors has increased demand for price concessions and caused the exclusion of suppliers from significant market segments, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Political, economic and policy influences are causing the healthcare and blood collection industries to make substantial structural and financial changes that affect our results of operations. Government and private sector initiatives limiting the growth of healthcare costs are causing structural reforms in healthcare delivery, including the reduction in blood use and reduced payments for care. These trends have placed greater pricing pressure on suppliers and, in some cases, decreased average selling prices and increased the number of sole source relationships. This pressure impacts our Hospital and Blood Center businesses. The influence of group purchasing organizations in the U.S., integrated delivery ne2rks and large single accounts has the potential to put price pressure on our Hospital business. It also puts price pressure on our U.S. Blood Center customers who are also facing reduced demand for red cells. Our Blood Center customers have responded to this pressure by creating their own group purchasing organizations and resorting to single source tenders to create incentives for suppliers, including us, to significantly reduce prices. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party reimbursement policies, government contracting requirements and societal pressures will continue to change the worldwide healthcare industry, resulting in further business consolidations and alliances among our customers and competitors. This may exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products and adversely impact our business, financial condition or results of operations. An interruption in our ability to manufacture our products, obtain key comp1nts or raw materials, or the failure of a sole source supplier may adversely affect our business. We have a complex global supply chain that involves integrating key suppliers and our manufacturing capacity into a global movement of comp1nts and finished goods. We manufacture certain key disposables at single locations with limited alternate facilities. If an event occurs that results in the closure of or damage to 1 or more of these facilities, we may be unable to supply the relevant products at previous levels or at all for some period. Additionally, for reasons of quality assurance or cost effectiveness, we purchase certain finished goods, comp1nts and raw materials from sole suppliers, notably JMS Co. Ltd., Kawasumi Laboratories, Leica Biosystems Melbourne Pty. Ltd., Sanmina Corporation and Sparton Medical Systems Colorado LLC, who have their own complex supply chains. Any disruption to 1 or more of our suppliers production or delivery of sufficient volumes of comp1nts conforming to our specifications, could disrupt or delay our ability to deliver finished products to our customers. For example, we purchase comp1nts in Asia for use in manufacturing in the U.S., Puerto Rico and Mexico. We source all of our apheresis equipment from Asia and regularly ship finished goods from the U.S., Puerto Rico and Mexico to the rest of the world. Due to the high standards and stringent requirements of the FDA and other similar non U.S. regulatory agencies applicable to manufacturing our products, such as the FDA's Quality System Regulation and Good Manufacturing Practices, we may not be able to quickly establish additional or replacement sources for certain raw materials, comp1nts or finished goods. A reduction or interruption in manufacturing, or an inability to secure alternative sources of raw materials, comp1nts or finished goods on commercially reasonable terms or in a timely manner, could compromise our ability to manufacture our products on a timely and cost competitive basis, which may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 17 Table of Contents Plastics are the principal comp1nt of our disposables, which are the main source of our revenues. Any change in the price, composition or availability of the plastics or resins we purchase could adversely affect our business. We face risks related to price, composition and availability of the plastic raw materials used in our business. Climate change (including laws or regulations passed in response thereto) could increase our costs, in particular our costs of supply, energy and transportation freight. Material or sustained increases in the price of petroleum or petroleum derivatives could have an adverse impact on the costs to procure plastic raw materials and the costs of our transportation freight. Increases in the costs of other commodities also may affect our procurement costs to a lesser degree. The composition of the plastic we purchase is also important. Today, we purchase plastics that contain phthalates, which are used to make plastic malleable. Should plastics with phthalates become unavailable due to regulatory changes, we may be required to obtain regulatory approvals from the FDA and foreign authorities for a number of products. While we have not experienced shortages in the past, any interruption in the supply for certain plastics could have a material impact on our business by limiting our ability to manufacture and sell the products that represent a significant portion of our revenues. These outcomes may in turn result in customers transitioning to available competitive products, loss of market share, negative publicity, reputational damage, loss of customer confidence or other negative consequences (including a decline in stock price). If we are unable to successfully expand our product lines through internal research and development, our business may be materially and adversely affected. A significant element of our strategy is to increase revenue growth by focusing on innovation and new product development. New product development requires significant investment in research and development, clinical trials and regulatory approvals. The results of our product development efforts may be affected by a number of factors, including our ability to anticipate customer needs, innovate and develop new products and technologies, successfully complete clinical trials, obtain regulatory approvals in the United States and abroad, manufacture products in a cost effective manner, obtain appropriate intellectual property protection for our products, and gain and maintain market acceptance of our products. In addition, patents attained by others could preclude or delay our commercialization of a product. There can be no assurance that any products now in development or that we may seek to develop in the future will achieve technological feasibility, obtain regulatory approval or gain market acceptance. We may not realize the benefits we expect from our Operational Excellence Program. In July 2019, our Board of Directors approved a new Operational Excellence Program, also referred to in this report as the 2020 Program, and delegated authority to management to determine the detail of the initiatives that will comprise the program. The 2020 Program is designed to improve operational performance and reduce cost principally in our manufacturing and supply chain operations. While cost savings from the 2020 Program to date have been consistent with our expectations, it is possible that events and circumstances, such as financial or strategic difficulties, delays and unexpected costs may occur, including as a direct or indirect result of the COVID 19 pandemic, that could result in our not realizing all of the anticipated benefits or our not realizing the anticipated benefits on our expected timetable. Our inability to realize all of the anticipated benefits from the 2020 Program could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, cash flows and financial condition. If our business development activities are unsuccessful, we may not realize the intended benefits. We may seek to supplement our organic growth through strategic acquisitions, investments and alliances. Such transactions are inherently risky and require significant effort and management attention. The success of any acquisition, investment or alliance may be affected by a number of factors, including our ability to properly assess and value the potential business opportunity or to successfully integrate any business we may acquire into our existing business. Promising partnerships and acquisitions may also not be completed for reasons such as competition among prospective partners or buyers, the inability to reach satisfactory terms, the need for regulatory approvals or the existence of economic conditions affecting our access to capital for acquisitions and other capital investments. If our business development activities are unsuccessful, we may not realize the intended benefits of such activities, including that acquisition and integration costs may be greater than expected or the possibility that expected return on investment synergies and accretion will not be realized or will not be realized within the expected timeframe. 18 Table of Contents As a medical device manufacturer we operate in a highly regulated industry, and non compliance with applicable laws or regulations could adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations. The manufacture, distribution and marketing of our products are subject to regulation by the FDA and other non U.S. regulatory bodies. Our operations are also subject to continuous review and monitoring by the FDA and other regulatory authorities. Failure to substantially comply with applicable regulations could subject our products to recall or seizure by government authorities, or an order to suspend manufacturing activities. If our products were determined to have design or manufacturing flaws, this could result in their recall or seizure. Either of these situations could also result in the imposition of fines. Additionally, the European Union regulatory bodies have adopted the EU MDR and the EU IVDR, each of which impose stricter requirements than prior European Union directives with respect to the marketing and sale of medical devices, including in the area of clinical data requirements, evaluation requirements, quality systems and post market surveillance. Manufacturers of currently approved medical devices will have until May 2021 to meet the requirements of the EU MDR and until May 2022 to meet the EU IVDR. Complying with the requirements of these regulations may require us to incur significant expenditures. Failure to meet these requirements could adversely impact our business in the European Union and other regions that tie their product registrations to the EU requirements. If we or our suppliers fail to comply with ongoing regulatory requirements, our products could be subject to restrictions or withdrawal from the market. Any product for which we obtain clearance or approval, and the manufacturing processes, reporting requirements, post approval clinical data and promotional activities for such product, will be subject to continued regulatory review, oversight and periodic inspection by the FDA and other domestic and foreign regulatory bodies. In particular, we and our third party suppliers must comply with the FDA's Quality System Regulation or current Good Manufacturing Practices requirements (depending on the products at issue). Any future failure by us or 1 of our suppliers to comply with applicable statutes and regulations administered by the FDA, or the failure to timely and adequately respond to any adverse inspectional observations or product safety issues, could result in enforcement actions. Any FDA sanctions could have a material adverse effect on our reputation, business, results of operations and financial condition. Furthermore, our key comp1nt suppliers may not currently be or may not continue to be in compliance with all applicable regulatory requirements, which could result in our failure to produce our products on a timely basis and in the required quantities, if at all. Our inability to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, any necessary U.S. or foreign regulatory clearances or approvals for our newly developed products or product enhancements could harm our business and prospects. Our products are subject to a high level of regulatory oversight. Most medical devices cannot be marketed in the U.S. without 510(k) clearance or premarket approval by the FDA. Our inability to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, any necessary U.S. or foreign regulatory clearances or approvals for newly developed products or product enhancements could harm our business and prospects. The process of obtaining clearances and approvals can be costly and time consuming. In addition, there is a risk that any approvals or clearances, once obtained, may be withdrawn or modified. Delays in receipt of, or failure to obtain, necessary clearances or approvals for our new products could delay or preclude realization of product revenues from new products or result in substantial additional costs which could decrease our profitability. Our relationships with customers and third party payers are subject to applicable anti kickback, fraud and abuse, transparency and other healthcare laws and regulations, which could expose us to criminal sanctions, civil penalties, exclusion, contractual damages, reputational harm and diminished profits and future earnings. We are subject to fraud and abuse and other healthcare laws and regulations that constrain the business or financial arrangements and relationships through which we market, sell and distribute our products. In addition, we are subject to transparency laws and patient privacy regulation by U.S. federal and state governments and by governments in foreign jurisdictions in which we conduct our business. The shifting commercial compliance environment and the need to build and maintain robust and expandable systems to comply with different compliance or reporting requirements in multiple jurisdictions increase the possibility that a healthcare or pharmaceutical company may fail to comply fully with 1 or more of these requirements. Efforts to ensure that our business 19 Table of Contents arrangements with third parties will comply with applicable healthcare laws and regulations may involve substantial costs. It is possible that governmental authorities will conclude that our business practices do not comply with applicable fraud and abuse or other healthcare laws and regulations or guidance. If our operations are found to be in violation of any of these laws or any other governmental regulations that may apply to us, we may be subject to significant civil, criminal and administrative penalties, damages, fines, exclusion from government funded healthcare programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid, and the curtailment or restructuring of our operations. If any of the physicians or other providers or entities with whom we expect to do business is found not to be in compliance with applicable laws, they may be subject to criminal, civil or administrative sanctions, including exclusions from government funded healthcare programs. Even if we are not determined to have violated these laws, government investigations into these issues typically require the expenditure of significant resources and generate negative publicity, which could harm our financial condition and divert resources and the attention of our management from operating our business. As a substantial amount of our revenue comes from outside the U.S., we are subject to geopolitical events, economic volatility, violations of anti corruption laws, export and import restrictions and tariffs, decisions by local regulatory authorities and the laws and medical practices in foreign jurisdictions. We do business in over 85 countries and have distributors in approximately 70 of these countries. This exposes us to currency fluctuation, geopolitical risk, economic volatility, anti corruption laws, export and import restrictions, local regulatory authorities and the laws and medical practices in foreign jurisdictions. If there are sanctions or restrictions on the flow of capital that prevent product importation or receipt of payments in Russia or China, our business could be adversely affected. Our international operations are governed by the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, or FCPA, and other similar anti corruption laws in other countries. Generally, these laws prohibit companies and their business partners or other intermediaries from making improper payments to foreign governments and government officials in order to obtain or retain business. Global enforcement of such anti corruption laws has increased in recent years, including aggressive investigations and enforcement proceedings. While we have an active compliance program and various other safeguards to discourage impermissible practices, we have distributors in approximately 70 countries, several of which are considered high risk for corruption. As a result, our global operations carry some risk of unauthorized impermissible activity on the part of 1 of our distributors, employees, agents or consultants. Any alleged or actual violation could subject us to government scrutiny, severe criminal or civil fines, or sanctions on our ability to export product outside the U.S., which could adversely affect our reputation and financial condition. Export of U.S. technology or goods manufactured in the U.S. to some jurisdictions requires special U.S. export authorization or local market controls that may be influenced by factors, including political dynamics, outside our control. Finally, any other significant changes in the competitive, legal, regulatory, reimbursement or economic environments of the jurisdictions in which we conduct our international business could have a material impact on our business. We sell our products in certain emerging economies which exposes us to less mature regulatory systems, more volatile markets for our products and greater credit risks. A loss of funding for our products or changes to the regulatory regime could lead to lost revenue or account receivables. There are risks with doing business in emerging economies, such as Brazil, Russia, India and China. These economies tend to have less mature product regulatory systems and more volatile financial markets. In addition, the government controlled healthcare system's ability to invest in our products and systems may abruptly shift due to changing government priorities or funding capacity. Our ability to sell products in these economies is dependent upon our ability to hire qualified employees or agents to represent our products locally and our ability to obtain and maintain the necessary regulatory approvals in a less mature regulatory environment. If we are unable to retain qualified representatives or maintain the necessary regulatory approvals, we will not be able to continue to sell products in these markets. We are exposed to a higher degree of financial risk if we extend credit to customers in these economies. In many of the international markets in which we do business, including certain parts of Europe, South America, the Middle East and Asia, our employees, agents or distributors offer to sell our products in response to public tenders issued by various governmental agencies. There is additional risk in selling our products through agents or distributors, particularly in public tenders. If they misrepresent our products, do not provide appropriate service and delivery, or commit a violation of local or U.S. law, our reputation could be harmed and we could be subject to fines, sanctions or both. 20 Table of Contents Our success depends on our ability to attract and retain key personnel needed to successfully operate the business. Our ability to compete effectively depends on our ability to attract and retain key employees, including people in senior management, sales, marketing and R&D positions. Our ability to recruit and retain such talent will depend on a number of factors, including hiring practices of our competitors, compensation and benefits, work location, work environment and industry economic conditions. In December 2019, we relocated our corporate headquarters to a leased office space in Boston, Massachusetts. Although we believe our move to Boston will help us to attract and retain key talent and provide a dynamic space to engage our employees, competition for top talent in the healthcare market, and the increased cost or commuting time for current employees relocating or traveling to Boston could impact our ability to realize the intended results of the move. We have also effected organizational and strategic changes in the last several years, including our Complexity Reduction Initiative, which have resulted in workforce reductions. If we fail to effectively manage our ongoing organizational and strategic changes in a manner that allows us to retain and attract talent, our financial condition, results of operations and reputation, as well as our ability to successfully attract, motivate and retain key employees, could be harmed. Additionally, to the extent our senior management or other key employees are impacted by the COVID 19 pandemic and are not available to perform their job duties, we could experiences delays in, or the suspension of, important strategic and commercial objectives. We operate in an industry susceptible to significant product liability claims. Product liability claims could damage our reputation and impair our ability to market our products or obtain professional or product liability insurance, or increase the cost of such insurance. Our products are relied upon by medical personnel in connection with the treatment of patients and the collection of blood or blood comp1nts from donors. In the event that patients or donors sustain injury or death in connection with their condition or treatment, we, along with others, may be sued and whether or not we are ultimately determined to be liable, we may incur significant legal expenses. These claims may be brought by individuals seeking relief on their own behalf or purporting to represent a class. In addition, product liability claims may be asserted against us in the future based on events we are not aware of at the present time. Such litigation could damage our reputation and, therefore, impair our ability to market our products or obtain professional or product liability insurance, or increase the cost of such insurance. While we believe that our current product liability insurance coverage is sufficient, there is no assurance that such coverage will be adequate to cover incurred liabilities or that we will be able to obtain acceptable product and professional liability coverage in the future. If we are unable to meet our debt obligations or experience a disruption in our cash flows, it could have an adverse effect on our financial condition, results of operations or cost of borrowing. On June 15, 2018, we entered into a five year credit agreement with certain lenders which provided for a $350.0 million term loan (the "Term Loan") and a $350.0 million revolving loan (the "Revolving Credit Facility" and together with the Term Loan, the "Credit Facilities"). As of March 28, 2020 , we had $3238 million of debt outstanding under the Term Loan and $60.0 million outstanding under the Revolving Credit Facility. In April 2020, we borrowed an additional $150 million under our Revolving Credit Facility. The obligations to pay interest and repay the borrowed amounts may restrict our ability to adjust to adverse economic conditions and our ability to fund working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions or other general corporate requirements. The interest rate on borrowings under our Credit Facilities is variable and subject to change based on market forces. Fluctuations in interest rates could adversely affect our profitability and cash flows. In addition, as a global corporation, we have significant cash reserves held in foreign countries. Some of these balances may not be immediately available to repay our debt. Our Credit Facilities contain financial covenants that require us to maintain specified financial ratios and make interest and principal payments. As of March 28, 2020, we were in compliance with the covenants pursuant to our Credit Facilities, and we currently forecast that we will be in compliance with our credit facility covenants through the period ending April 3, 2021 If the impact of COVID 19 is more severe than currently forecasted this may impact our ability to comply with our Credit Facility covenants, and it not certain that we would be able to renegotiate the terms of our Credit Facility in order to provide relief related to the applicable covenants. If in the future we are unable to satisfy our Credit Facility covenants, and then were unable to renegotiate the terms thereof, we could be required to repay any borrowed amounts on short notice. 21 Table of Contents Our operations and plans for future growth may require additional capital that may not be available to us, or only available to us on unfavorable terms. Our operations and plans for future growth may require us to raise additional capital in the future. Our ability to issue additional debt or enter into other financing arrangements on acceptable terms could be adversely affected by our debt levels, unfavorable changes in economic conditions generally or uncertainties that affect the capital markets. Higher borrowing costs or the inability to access capital markets could adversely affect our ability to support future growth and operating requirements and, as a result, our business, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely affected. Refer to Liquidity and Capital Resources within our Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations contained in Item 7 of this Annual Report on Form 10 K for further discussion of our debt obligations. We are exposed to fluctuations in currency exchange rates, which could adversely affect our cash flows and results of operations. International revenues and expenses account for a substantial portion of our operations. In fiscal 2020 , our international revenues accounted for 34.6% of our total revenues. The exposure to fluctuations in currency exchange rates takes different forms. Reported revenues, as well as manufacturing and operational costs denominated in foreign currencies by our international businesses, fluctuate due to exchange rate movement when translated into U.S. dollars for financial reporting purposes. Fluctuations in exchange rates could adversely affect our profitability in U.S. dollars of products and services sold by us into international markets, where payment for our products and services and related manufacturing and operational costs is made in local currencies. Our effective tax rate may fluctuate and we may incur obligations in tax jurisdictions in excess of amounts that have been accrued. We are subject to taxation in numerous countries, states and other jurisdictions. In preparing our financial statements, we record the amount of tax payable in each of the jurisdictions in which we operate. Our future effective tax rate, however, may be lower or higher than prior years due to numerous factors, including a change in our geographic earnings mix, changes in the measurement of our deferred taxes and recently enacted and future tax law changes in jurisdictions in which we operate. Changes in our operations, including headcount in Switzerland, Puerto Rico or Malaysia, could adversely affect our tax rate due to favorable tax rulings in these jurisdictions. We are also subject to tax audits in various jurisdictions and tax authorities may disagree with certain positions we have taken and assess additional taxes. Any of these factors could cause us to experience an effective tax rate significantly different from previous periods or our current expectations, which could adversely affect our business, results of operations and cash flows. Changes in tax laws or exposure to additional income tax liabilities could have a material impact on our financial condition, results of operations and or liquidity. We are subject to income taxes, non income based taxes and tax audits, in both the U.S. and various foreign jurisdictions. Tax authorities may disagree with certain positions we have taken and assess additional taxes. We regularly assess the likely outcomes of these audits in order to determine the appropriateness of our tax provision and have established contingency reserves for material, known tax exposures. However, the calculation of such tax exposures involves the application of complex tax laws and regulations in many jurisdictions, as well as interpretations as to the legality under various rules in certain jurisdictions. Therefore, there can be no assurance that we will accurately predict the outcomes of these disputes or other tax audits or that issues raised by tax authorities will be resolved at a financial cost that does not exceed our related reserves and the actual outcomes of these disputes and other tax audits could have a material impact on our results of operations or financial condition. Changes in tax laws and regulations, or their interpretation and application, in the jurisdictions where we are subject to tax could materially impact our effective tax rate. For example, in 2017, the U.S. enacted the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, or the Act, and we expect the U.S. Treasury to issue future notices and regulations under the Act. Certain provisions of the Act and the regulations issued thereunder could have a significant impact on our future results of operations as could interpretations made by the Company in the absence of regulatory guidance and judicial interpretations. The result of the upcoming U.S. presidential and congressional elections may result in additional U.S. tax law changes that could have a material impact on our future effective tax rate. Additionally, the U.S. Congress, government agencies in non U.S. jurisdictions where we and our affiliates do business and the Organization for Economic Co operation and Development, or OECD, have recently focused on issues related to the taxation of multinational corporations. The OECD has released its comprehensive plan to create an agreed set of international rules for 22 Table of Contents fighting base erosion and profit shifting. In addition, the OECD, the European Commission and individual countries are examining changes to how taxing rights should be allocated among countries in light of the digital economy. As a result, the tax laws in the U.S. and other countries in which we and our affiliates do business could change on a prospective or retroactive basis and any such changes could materially adversely affect our business. Our share price has been volatile and may fluctuate, and accordingly, the value of an investment in our common stock may also fluctuate. Stock markets in general and our common stock in particular have experienced significant price and trading volume volatility over recent years. The market price and trading volume of our common stock may continue to be subject to significant fluctuations due to factors described under this Item 1A. Risk Factors, as well as economic and geopolitical conditions in general and to variability in the prevailing sentiment regarding our operations or business prospects, as well as, among other things, changing investment priorities of our shareholders. Because the market price of our common stock fluctuates significantly, shareholders may not be able sell their shares at attractive prices. Our share repurchase program could affect the price of our common stock and increase volatility and may be suspended or terminated at any time, which may result in a decrease in the trading price of our common stock. On May 7, 2019, we announced that our Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $500 million of our outstanding common stock over the next 2 years. Under the share repurchase program, we are authorized to repurchase, from time to time, outstanding shares of common stock in accordance with applicable laws both on the open market, including under trading plans established pursuant to Rule 10b5 1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended and in privately negotiated transactions. The actual timing, number and value of shares repurchased will be determined by us and will depend on a number of factors, including market conditions, applicable legal requirements and compliance with the terms of loan covenants. The share repurchase program may be suspended, modified or discontinued at any time and we have no obligation to repurchase any amount of its common stock under the program. Repurchases pursuant to our share repurchase program could affect our stock price and increase its volatility. The existence of a share repurchase program could also cause our stock price to be higher than it would be in the absence of such a program and could potentially reduce the market liquidity for our common stock. There can be no assurance that any share repurchases will enhance shareholder value because the market price of our common stock may decline below the levels at which we repurchased our common stock. Although our share repurchase program is intended to enhance long term shareholder value, short term stock price fluctuations could reduce the program effectiveness. Refer to Note 7 , Earnings per Share , to our consolidated financial statements contained in Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10 K for further discussion. There is a risk that our intellectual property may be subject to misappropriation in some countries. Certain countries, particularly China, do not enforce compliance with laws that protect intellectual property rights with the same degree of vigor as is available under the U.S. and European systems of justice. Further, certain of our intellectual property rights are not registered in China, or if they were, have since expired. This may permit others to produce copies of products in China that are not covered by currently valid patent registrations. There is also a risk that such products may be exported from China to other countries. In order to aggressively protect our intellectual property throughout the world, we have a program of patent disclosures and filings in markets where we conduct significant business. While we believe this program is reasonable and adequate, the risk of loss is inherent in litigation as different legal systems offer different levels of protection to intellectual property and it is still possible that even patented technologies may not be protected absolutely from infringement. Pending and future intellectual property litigation could be costly and disruptive to us. We operate in an industry that is susceptible to significant intellectual property litigation. This type of litigation is expensive, complex and lengthy and its outcome is difficult to predict. Patent litigation may result in adverse outcomes and could significantly divert the attention of our technical and management personnel. Our products may be determined to infringe another party's patent, which could lead to financial losses or adversely affect our ability to market our products. There is a risk that 1 or more of our products may be determined to infringe a patent held by another party. If this were to occur, we may be subject to an injunction or to payment of royalties, or both, which may adversely affect our ability to market 23 Table of Contents the affected product or otherwise have an adverse effect on our results of operations. In addition, competitors may patent technological advances that may give them a competitive advantage or create barriers to entry. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS N1 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
